test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-AN-kihcokiniy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - kihci-okiniy - ok : # -m animate noun, tomato, Wolvengrey
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg: kihci-okiniy
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nikihci-okiniy
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kikihci-okiniy
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: okihci-okiniya
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: okihci-okinîyiwa
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nikihci-okinînân
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kikihci-okinînaw
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kikihci-okinîwâw
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: okihci-okinîwâwa
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: okihci-okinîyiwa
     
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl: kihci-okiniyak
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nikihci-okiniyak
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kikihci-okiniyak
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: okihci-okiniya
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: okihci-okinîyiwa
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nikihci-okinînânak
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kikihci-okinînawak
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kikihci-okinîwâwak
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: okihci-okinîwâwa
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: okihci-okinîyiwa
     
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Obv: kihci-okiniya
     
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Loc: kihci-okinîhk
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nikihci-okinîhk
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kikihci-okinîhk
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: okihci-okinîhk
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: okihci-okinîyihk
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nikihci-okinînâhk
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kikihci-okinînâhk
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kikihci-okinîwâhk
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: okihci-okinîwâhk
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: okihci-okinîyihk
     
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [kihci-okinîs, kihci-okinîsis]
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [kihci-okinîsak, kihci-okinîsisak]
